Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1503
Wellhead protection area; designation.

Any controlling entity may designate a wellhead protection area and adopt controls pursuant to the Wellhead Protection Area Act for the purpose of protecting the public water supply system. The department shall provide technical assistance to any controlling entity designating a wellhead protection area and adopting controls pursuant to the act.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 4.